Alabama, session 2026rs, HB443.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
62 Section 1. This act shall apply only to an Article V
63 Convention of the states.
64 Section 2. For the purposes of this act, the following
65 terms have the following meanings:
66 (1) ALTERNATE COMMISSIONER. An individual appointed by
67 the Legislature to serve as a commissioner to an Article V
68 Convention in place of another commissioner who cannot execute
69 his or her duties.
70 (2) ARTICLE V CONVENTION. A convention called by
71 two-thirds of the states for proposing amendments to the
72 United States Constitution as provided under Article V of the
73 Constitution.
74 (3) COMMISSIONER. An individual appointed by the
75 Legislature to represent the State of Alabama at an Article V
76 Convention.
77 (4) DELEGATION. The group of commissioners and
78 alternate commissioners appointed by the Legislature to attend
79 an Article V Convention.
80 Section 3. (a) Whenever an Article V Convention is
81 called by the states, the Legislature shall appoint three
82 commissioners and three alternate commissioners to represent
83 the State of Alabama at the Article V Convention.
84 (b)(1) The Legislature shall appoint the commissioners
Page 3

(b)(1) The Legislature shall appoint the commissioners
HB443 INTRODUCED
85 and alternate commissioners by joint resolution adopted during
86 a joint session of the Legislature.
87 (2) If the Legislature is not in session during the
88 time when commissioners to an Article V Convention must be
89 appointed, the Governor shall call the Legislature into
90 special session under Section 122 of the Constitution of
91 Alabama of 2022, for the purpose of appointing commissioners
92 and alternate commissioners.
93 (c) The Legislature may appoint additional
94 commissioners and alternate commissioners, but the total
95 number of commissioners and the total number of alternate
96 commissioners shall each be an odd number.
97 (d)(1) To be appointed a commissioner or alternate
98 commissioner, an individual must receive, in each house of the
99 Legislature, the vote of a majority of all the members elected
100 to each house.
101 (2) At the time of appointment, each alternate
102 commissioner must be paired with a commissioner as provided in
103 a joint resolution adopted by the Legislature.
104 (e)(1) The Legislature may recall any commissioner or
105 alternate commissioner and replace that commissioner or
106 alternate commissioner with an individual appointed under this
107 act at any time by joint resolution.
108 (2) If the Legislature is not in session, the advisory
109 committee, established under Section 8, may recall and remove
110 any commissioner or alternate commissioner upon a
111 determination by the advisory committee that a commissioner or
112 alternate commissioner exceeded the scope of his or her
Page 4

alternate commissioner exceeded the scope of his or her
HB443 INTRODUCED
113 authority pursuant to Section 9, pending a vote of the
114 Legislature.
115 Section 4. (a) To be appointed as a commissioner or
116 alternate commissioner to an Article V Convention, an
117 individual shall satisfy all of the following requirements:
118 (1) The individual shall be a United States citizen for
119 at least five years preceding appointment.
120 (2) The individual shall be an Alabama resident for at
121 least five years preceding appointment.
122 (3) The individual shall be at least 25 years of age.
123 (4) The individual shall be a registered voter in the
124 State of Alabama.
125 (5) The individual shall not currently be registered or
126 required to be registered as a federal lobbyist, or have been
127 registered or required to be registered as a federal lobbyist
128 at any time in the five years preceding appointment.
129 (6) The individual shall not currently be a federal
130 employee or contractor, or have been a federal employee or
131 contractor at any time in the 10 years preceding appointment,
132 excluding members of the United States Armed Forces.
133 (7) The individual shall not currently hold a federal
134 elected or appointed office, or have held a federal elected or
135 appointed office at any time in the 10 years preceding
136 appointment.
137 (8) The individual shall not have been convicted of any
138 felony in any jurisdiction in the 10 years preceding
139 appointment.
140 (b) An individual appointed as a commissioner or
Page 5

(b) An individual appointed as a commissioner or
HB443 INTRODUCED
141 alternate commissioner shall not hold statewide office while
142 performing duties as a commissioner or alternate commissioner.
143 "Statewide office" does not include service as a member of the
144 Legislature.
145 Section 5. (a)(1) The joint resolution appointing the
146 commissioners and alternate commissioners shall include the
147 following instructions:
148 a. A commissioner shall not vote for or otherwise
149 promote any change to the traditional convention rule that
150 each state has one vote.
151 b. A commissioner shall not vote in favor of any
152 proposed amendment that would alter the text of the specific
153 guarantees of individual liberty established by the
154 Constitution, including the Constitution, Bill of Rights, or
155 any amendment guaranteeing individual rights.
156 (2) The joint resolution appointing the commissioners
157 and alternate commissioners shall state that the scope of the
158 commissioner's authority is limited by the subject matter in
159 the State of Alabama's application calling for an Article V
160 Convention, as set forth in Act 2015-222 of the 2015 Regular
161 Session.
162 (3) The Legislature may provide any additional
163 instructions at any time by adopting a subsequent joint
164 resolution and providing each commissioner, alternate
165 commissioner, and member of the advisory committee a copy of
166 the subsequent resolution.
167 (b)(1) Each commissioner and alternate commissioner,
168 upon appointment and before exercising any function as a
Page 6

upon appointment and before exercising any function as a
HB443 INTRODUCED
169 commissioner or alternate commissioner, shall execute the
170 following oath in writing: "I do solemnly swear (or affirm)
171 that I accept and will act according to the limits of
172 authority specified in my commission and any present or
173 subsequent instructions. I understand that violating this oath
174 may subject me to penalties provided by law. I understand that
175 I may be recalled or removed from my duties by the Legislature
176 or the advisory committee."
177 (2) A commissioner's executed oath shall be filed with
178 the Alabama Secretary of State.
179 (c) After a commissioner's or alternate commissioner's
180 executed oath is filed with the Secretary of State, the Clerk
181 of the House of Representatives shall provide to the
182 commissioner or alternate commissioner an official copy of the
183 executed oath and commissioning resolution, which together
184 shall serve as the commissioner or alternate commissioner's
185 credentials.
186 Section 6. (a)(1) A commissioner or alternate
187 commissioner shall receive the same compensation as a member
188 of the House of Representatives of this state, prorated for
189 length of time served.
190 (2) A commissioner or alternate commissioner is
191 entitled to receive the same allowance for expenses as
192 provided to a member of the House of Representatives of this
193 state.
194 (b)(1) A commissioner or alternate commissioner shall
195 not accept any gifts or benefits with a combined value of more
196 than two hundred dollars ($200), other than from a member of
Page 7

than two hundred dollars ($200), other than from a member of
HB443 INTRODUCED
197 his or her family and of the kind customarily granted by a
198 member of one's family, during his or her time of service.
199 (2) For the purpose of this section, "gift or benefit"
200 shall be construed liberally to include current and future
201 loans, lodging, food, offer of prospective employment, and
202 other actual and prospective benefits, but shall not include
203 an employer's decision to continue paying a commissioner's
204 current salary.
205 Section 7. (a) The commissioners in the delegation,
206 including alternate commissioners filling a vacancy, shall
207 select from among themselves a chair, a commissioner to cast
208 votes on behalf of the delegation, and a commissioner to serve
209 as the spokesperson for the delegation. If the delegation so
210 decides, the same commissioner may exercise all of the
211 preceding functions. The delegation may designate a different
212 commissioner to perform any function at any time.
213 (b) Each commissioner shall take care to avoid
214 communicating the impression to any person outside the
215 delegation that the delegation is divided on a question on
216 which the delegation has taken a formal position, including,
217 but not limited to, casting a vote.
218 (c) No commissioner other than the one designated as
219 the spokesperson may communicate with the mass media about
220 convention business during the convention or during any
221 temporary recess or temporary adjournment.
222 (d) A commissioner violating subsection (b) or (c) may
223 be recalled or removed by the advisory committee or the
224 Legislature.
Page 8

Legislature.
HB443 INTRODUCED
225 (e) Subsection (b) and (c) shall not be construed to
226 prevent a commissioner from presenting his or her opinions to
227 the convention or debating a matter at the convention on which
228 the delegation has not formally taken a position.
229 (f) The quorum for decision-making by the delegation,
230 including the designation of commissioners for particular
231 duties and the determination of how the state's vote shall be
232 cast, shall be a majority present and voting at the time the
233 delegation is polled. No decisions shall be made and no vote
234 shall be cast if less than a majority of the delegation votes
235 in the poll.
236 (g) The rule of decision for the delegation, a quorum
237 being present, shall be a majority of those present and voting
238 at the time of polling.
239 Section 8. (a) The advisory committee shall consist of
240 the following members:
241 (1) One member of the Senate appointed by the President
242 Pro Tempore of the Senate.
243 (2) One member of the House of Representatives
244 appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.
245 (3) One member of the Legislature, jointly nominated by
246 the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the
247 House of Representatives, and approved by a majority vote of
248 the Senate and the House of Representatives.
249 (b) The advisory committee shall select one of its
250 members as the chair.
251 (c)(1) A commissioner may request that the advisory
252 committee advise him or her as to whether a prospective action
Page 9

committee advise him or her as to whether a prospective action
HB443 INTRODUCED
253 by the commissioner would violate the commissioning resolution
254 or any subsequent instructions.
255 (2) The advisory committee shall provide to the
256 commissioner requesting advice pursuant to subdivision (1) a
257 determination within 24 hours of receiving the request by any
258 appropriate medium.
259 (d) The advisory committee shall have authority to hire
260 staff and develop appropriate procedures and mechanisms for
261 monitoring the convention, its committees, and subcommittees.
262 Section 9. (a) Whenever the advisory committee has
263 reason to believe that a commissioner or alternate
264 commissioner has exceeded the scope of his or her authority,
265 the advisory committee shall notify the Speaker of the House
266 of Representatives, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate,
267 and the Attorney General.
268 (b) The Speaker of the House of Representatives,
269 President Pro Tempore of the Senate, or Attorney General may
270 request the advisory committee to issue a determination about
271 whether a commissioner or alternate commissioner has exceeded
272 the scope of his or her authority. The advisory committee
273 shall issue a determination on whether the commissioner or
274 alternate commissioner exceeded his or her authority
275 expeditiously, and the advisory committee shall communicate
276 the determination to the person requesting the determination
277 as soon as the determination is made.
278 (c) Upon determining that a commissioner or alternate
279 commissioner has exceeded the scope of his or her authority as
280 provided by this section, the advisory committee shall
Page 10

provided by this section, the advisory committee shall
HB443 INTRODUCED
281 immediately exercise its authority under Section 3 to recall
282 and remove the commissioner. The advisory committee shall
283 communicate the action and the reasons to the Speaker of the
284 House of Representatives, President Pro Tempore of the Senate,
285 the Attorney General, and the presiding officers of the
286 convention.
287 Section 10. (a)(1) A commissioner or alternate
288 commissioner to an Article V Convention shall not exceed the
289 scope of his or her authority when acting as a commissioner or
290 alternate commissioner. A commissioner or alternate
291 commissioner exceeds the scope of his or her authority by
292 voting or otherwise acting beyond the authority granted in his
293 or her commission, as revised by any subsequent instructions
294 provided before a vote or other action.
295 (2) A commissioner or alternate commissioner who
296 exceeds the scope of his or her authority shall be guilty of a
297 Class C felony.
298 (b) Any individual who knowingly bribes, threatens,
299 intimidates, or obstructs a commissioner or alternate
300 commissioner in the performance of his or her duties, or
301 attempts to do so, shall be guilty of a Class C felony.
302 Section 11. This act shall become effective on October
303 1, 2026.
Page 11